Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5949YH (2) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2143 Section 1. Section 298.4, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. To pay the costs of targeted staff 3 retention incentives, including retention bonuses or other 4 financial incentives for employees serving in critical 5 positions; employees holding high-need endorsements or 6 credentials in areas such as special education, mathematics, 7 science, and career and technical education; and classified 8 employees serving in essential operational roles. 9 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school budget 10 years beginning on or after July 1, 2026. 11